Tennessee, session 114, SB1059.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-14-105, is amended by deleting the
language "Within ten (10) days after receipt of an order to hold a special election" and
substituting instead "Within fifteen (15) days after receipt of an order to hold a special election".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1059
003258
- 1 -